Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 3. Prohibitions on Feeding Garbage to Swine.

§ 3.2-6031.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Garbage”
means animal and vegetable wastes resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking, and consumption of foods containing animal carcasses or parts thereof. The Commissioner may in his discretion exclude from this definition such wastes that have been heat treated to the extent that the resultant material is of a uniform consistency, contains by analysis not more than 10 percent moisture, and that he has determined to be nonputrescible. Such treated nonputrescible wastes shall be “commercial feed” as the term is defined in §

3.2-4800

, and shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 48 (§

3.2-4800

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 3-598.1; 1954, c. 506; 1956, c. 308; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-758; 1970, c. 619; 1994, c. 743; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6032.
Unlawful to feed garbage to swine.

No person shall feed or knowingly allow any other person to feed any garbage to swine on his premises or any premises over which he has any control.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-598.2; 1954, c. 506; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-759; 1970, c. 619; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6033.
Ordinances prohibiting feeding of certain putrescible wastes.

The governing body of any locality may by ordinance prohibit the feeding to swine within its jurisdiction of putrescible wastes resulting from the handling, preparation, cooking, and consumption of foods that do not contain animal carcasses or parts thereof.

History.

1970, c. 619, § 3.1-762.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6034.
Commissioner to enjoin violations.

The Commissioner may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this article in the circuit court of the county or city where such violation occurs.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-598.6; 1954, c. 506; 1956, c. 308; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-763; 1970, c. 619; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 563.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 563 rewrote the section, which read “Any person who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each day upon which such violation occurs is a separate offense. In addition to the penalties herein provided, such person may be enjoined from continuing such violation.”